Maryland, session 2025, HB1556.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
2–1103.1.
(b) (1) On or before December 1, 2023, the Department shall adopt regulations
establishing requirements for the sale of new zero–emission medium– and heavy–duty
vehicles in the State.
(2) The regulations adopted under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall:
(i) Update existing regulations;
(ii) Incorporate by reference the California Air Resources Board’s
Advanced Clean Trucks regulations, as revised and updated; and
(iii) Subject to subsection (d) of this section, take effect starting with
model year 2027.

HOUSE BILL 1556 3
(c) (1) The Department, in consultation with the Department of
Transportation, the Department of General Services, the Maryland Energy
Administration, and the Public Service Commission, shall prepare a needs assessment and
deployment plan relating to the successful implementation of regulations adopted under
this section.
(2) The needs assessment and deployment plan shall assess and plan for:
(i) The additional electrical capacity, transmission, distribution
demands, and hydrogen fueling demands that will result from implementation of the
regulations, and the ability of the State’s electric utilities, grid, and hydrogen
infrastructure to meet those demands, based on publicly available information and existing
analyses;
(ii) The number of zero–emission medium– and heavy–duty vehicle
recharging and refueling stations recommended for implementation of the regulations, and
the costs, permitting processes, and timelines for installing those stations;
(iii) The purchase incentives and other mechanisms recommended
for successful implementation of the regulations, including incentives for recharging and
refueling stations and related infrastructure, and the existing and potential sources of
funding for those incentives and mechanisms; and
(iv) The timeline, economic feasibility, and models available for
transitioning medium– and heavy–duty vehicles in the State vehicle fleet, including
State–contracted medium– and heavy–duty vehicles, to zero–emission vehicles.
(3) On or before December 1, 2024, the Department shall submit the needs
assessment and deployment plan to the General Assembly in accordance with § 2–1257 of
the State Government Article.
(d) (1) The Department may delay implementation of the regulations
authorized under this section by one or more model years if, after consulting with the
Department of Transportation, the Department of General Services, the Maryland Energy
Administration, and the Public Service Commission, the Department determines, based on
criteria identified through the needs assessment and deployment plan, that
implementation of the regulations is not yet feasible.
(2) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
DEPARTMENT MAY NOT IMPLEMENT THE REGULATIONS AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS
SECTION UNTIL THE NEEDS ASSESSMENT AND DEPLOYMENT PLAN IS PUBLISHED.
(II) 1. IF THE NEEDS ASSESSMENT AND DEPLOYMENT PLAN
IS PUBLISHED ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2025, THE DEPARTMENT MAY
IMPLEMENT THE REGULATIONS BEGINNING WITH MODEL YEAR 2028.

HOUSE BILL 1556
2. IF THE NEEDS ASSESSMENT AND DEPLOYMENT PLAN
IS PUBLISHED AFTER DECEMBER 1, 2025, THE DEPARTMENT MAY IMPLEMENT THE
REGULATIONS BEGINNING WITH MODEL YEAR 2029.
2–1106.
(a) (1) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE enforcement and penalty provisions of Subtitle 6 of this title shall apply
to a violation of this subtitle.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT APPLY THE ENFORCEMENT OR
PENALTY PROVISIONS OF SUBTITLE 6 OF THIS TITLE FOR FAILURE TO MEET ANY
REQUIREMENTS UNDER THE CALIFORNIA ADVANCED CLEAN CARS II PROGRAM OR
THE ADVANCED CLEAN TRUCKS REGULATIONS FOR THE FOLLOWING MODEL
YEARS:
(I) 2027; AND
(II) 2028.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT MAY APPLY THE ENFORCEMENT OR PENALTY
PROVISIONS OF SUBTITLE 6 OF THIS TITLE TO A MOTOR VEHICLE MANUFACTURER
FOR FAILURE TO MEET ANY REQUIREMENTS UNDER THE ADVANCED CLEAN CARS II
PROGRAM FOR MODEL YEAR 2027 OR MODEL YEAR 2028 ONLY IF:
(I) THE DEPARTMENT IS CARRYING OUT IMPLEMENTATION OR
ENFORCEMENT PENALTIES THAT HAVE BEEN AGREED ON BY MOTOR VEHICLE
MANUFACTURERS REPRESENTING AT LEAST 40% OF THE STATE’S MARKET SHARE
FOR PASSENGER CARS AND LIGHT TRUCK VEHICLES SUBJECT TO ACC II IN THE
STATE FOR THE CALENDAR YEAR IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE AGREEMENT; AND
(II) 1. FOR MODEL YEAR 2027, THE MOTOR VEHICLE
MANUFACTURERS ENTERED INTO THE AGREEMENT BETWEEN JANUARY 1, 2025,
AND JANUARY 1, 2026, INCLUSIVE; OR
2. FOR MODEL YEAR 2028, THE MOTOR VEHICLE
MANUFACTURERS ENTERED INTO THE AGREEMENT BETWEEN JANUARY 1, 2025,
AND JANUARY 1, 2027, INCLUSIVE.
(b) Each transfer or attempted transfer of a motor vehicle or motor vehicle engine
in violation of § 2–1104(b) of this subtitle shall constitute a separate violation of the
provisions of this subtitle.

HOUSE BILL 1556 5
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act may not be construed
to have any effect on the annual percentage sales targets established under the Advanced
Clean Cars II Program or the Advanced Clean Trucks Program.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.